tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
match %[_~^]%<* 'twould (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145
match %[_~^]%<* 'twould've (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* 'twoulda (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1
match %[_~^]%<* 'twouldn't (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1345-3-2345
match %[_~^]%<* 'twouldn't've (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* aboutface (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-15
match %[_~^]%<* aboutfaced (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-1246
match %[_~^]%<* aboutfacer (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-12456
match %[_~^]%<* aboutfacing (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-346
match %[_~^]%<* aboutturn (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-2345-136-1235-1345
match %[_~^]%<* aboutturned (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-2345-136-1235-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* aboveboard (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-1236-12-135-345-145
match %[_~^]%<* aboveground (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-1236-1245-1235-46-145
match %[_~^]%<* abovementioned (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-1236-134-26-56-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* accordingly (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-14-123-13456
match %[_~^]%<* aforesaid (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-123456-15-234-145
match %[_~^]%<* afterbattle (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-1-2345-2345-123-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterbirth (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-24-1235-1456
match %[_~^]%<* afterbreakfast (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-1235-2-13-124-1-34
match %[_~^]%<* afterburn (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345
match %[_~^]%<* afterburned (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* afterburner (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* afterburning (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345-346
match %[_~^]%<* aftercare (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-14-345-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterclap (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-14-123-1-1234
match %[_~^]%<* aftercoffee (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-14-12356-124-15-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterdamp (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-1-134-1234
match %[_~^]%<* afterdark (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-345-13
match %[_~^]%<* afterdeck (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* afterdinner (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-35-1345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* afterflow (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-124-123-246
match %[_~^]%<* aftergame (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1245-1-134-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterglow (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1245-123-246
match %[_~^]%<* afterguard (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1245-136-345-145
match %[_~^]%<* afterhatch (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-125-1-2345-16
match %[_~^]%<* afterhatches (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-125-1-2345-16-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* afterhour (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-125-1256-1235
match %[_~^]%<* afterlife (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-24-124-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterlight (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-24-126-2345
match %[_~^]%<* afterlives (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-24-1236-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* afterlunch (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-136-1345-16
match %[_~^]%<* afterlunches (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-136-1345-16-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* aftermarket (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-345-13-15-2345
match %[_~^]%<* aftermatch (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-1-2345-16
match %[_~^]%<* aftermatches (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-1-2345-16-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* aftermath (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-1-1456
match %[_~^]%<* aftermeeting (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-15-15-2345-346
match %[_~^]%<* aftermidday (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-24-145-5-145
match %[_~^]%<* aftermidnight (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-24-145-1345-24-126-2345
match %[_~^]%<* aftermost (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-135-34
match %[_~^]%<* afternoontea (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1345-2345-15-1
match %[_~^]%<* afterpain (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1234-1-35
match %[_~^]%<* afterparties (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-1234-24-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* afterparty (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-1234-13456
match %[_~^]%<* afterpiece (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1234-24-15-14-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterplay (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1234-123-1-13456
match %[_~^]%<* aftersale (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-1-123-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterschool (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-16-135-135-123
match %[_~^]%<* aftersensation (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-26-234-1-56-1345
match %[_~^]%<* aftershave (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-1-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* aftershock (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-135-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* aftershow (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-246
match %[_~^]%<* aftershower (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-246-12456
match %[_~^]%<* aftersupper (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-136-1234-1234-12456
match %[_~^]%<* aftertaste (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1-34-15
match %[_~^]%<* aftertax (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1-1346
match %[_~^]%<* aftertaxes (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1-1346-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* aftertea (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-15-1
match %[_~^]%<* aftertheatre (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2346-1-2345-1235-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterthought (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1456-5-1256
match %[_~^]%<* aftertime (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-2345
match %[_~^]%<* aftertreatment (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1235-2-2345-56-2345
match %[_~^]%<* afterword (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-45-2456
match %[_~^]%<* afterwork (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-2456
match %[_~^]%<* afterworld (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-456-2456
match %[_~^]%<* apperceive (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236
match %[_~^]%<* apperceived (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236-145
match %[_~^]%<* apperceiver (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* apperceiving (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236-1245
match %[_~^]%<* archdeceiver (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 345-16-145-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* beforehand (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-124-125-12346
match %[_~^]%<* befriend (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-124-1235
match %[_~^]%<* behindhand (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-125-125-12346
match %[_~^]%<* belittle (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123
match %[_~^]%<* belittled (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* belittlement (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123-56-2345
match %[_~^]%<* belittler (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* belowdeck (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* belowground (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-1245-1235-46-145
match %[_~^]%<* belowmentioned (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-134-26-56-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* beneathdeck (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-1345-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* beneathground (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-1345-1245-1235-46-145
match %[_~^]%<* betweendeck (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-2345-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* betweentime (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-2345-5-2345
match %[_~^]%<* betweenwhile (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-2345-156-24-123-15
match %[_~^]%<* blindfish (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-24-146
match %[_~^]%<* blindfishes (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-24-146-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindfold (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* blindfolded (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145-1246
match %[_~^]%<* blindfolder (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145-12456
match %[_~^]%<* blindfolding (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145-346
match %[_~^]%<* blindly (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-123-13456
match %[_~^]%<* blindman (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-134-1-1345
match %[_~^]%<* blindmen (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-134-26
match %[_~^]%<* blindness (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindnesses (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindside (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-15
match %[_~^]%<* blindsided (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-1246
match %[_~^]%<* blindsider (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-12456
match %[_~^]%<* blindsiding (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-346
match %[_~^]%<* blindsight (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-126-2345
match %[_~^]%<* blindstories (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-34-135-1235-24-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindstory (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-34-135-1235-13456
match %[_~^]%<* blindworm (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-2456-135-1235-134
match %[_~^]%<* bloodletter (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-135-135-145-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* boyfriend (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-135-13456-124-1235
match %[_~^]%<* brailled (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* brailler (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* braillewriter (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-2456-1235-24-2345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* braillewriting (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-2456-1235-24-2345-346
match %[_~^]%<* brailley (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-13456
match %[_~^]%<* brainchildren (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-1-35-16-1345
match %[_~^]%<* chainletter (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 16-1-35-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* children'swear (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 16-1345-3-234-2456-15-345
match %[_~^]%<* colorblind (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-135-1235-12-123
match %[_~^]%<* colorblindness (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-135-1235-12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* colorblindnesses (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-135-1235-12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* colourblind (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-1256-1235-12-123
match %[_~^]%<* colourblindness (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-1256-1235-12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* colourblindnesses (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-1256-1235-12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* conceived (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 25-14-1236-145
match %[_~^]%<* conceiver (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 25-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* could've (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* coulda (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1
match %[_~^]%<* couldest (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-15-34
match %[_~^]%<* couldn't (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1345-3-2345
match %[_~^]%<* couldn't've (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* couldst (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-34
match %[_~^]%<* deafblind (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-2-124-12-123
match %[_~^]%<* deafblindness (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-2-124-12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* deafblindnesses (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-2-124-12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* deceived (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-1236-145
match %[_~^]%<* deceiver (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* declared (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* declarer (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* defriend (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-15-124-1235
match %[_~^]%<* do-it-yourselfer (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-36-1346-36-13456-1235-124-12456
match %[_~^]%<* doublequick (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-1256-12-123-15-12345-13
match %[_~^]%<* eastabout (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 15-1-34-1-12
match %[_~^]%<* feelgood (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-15-15-123-1245-145
match %[_~^]%<* feetfirst (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-15-15-2345-124-34
match %[_~^]%<* firstaid (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1-24-145
match %[_~^]%<* firstaider (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1-24-145-12456
match %[_~^]%<* firstborn (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-12-135-1235-1345
match %[_~^]%<* firstclass (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-14-123-1-234-234
match %[_~^]%<* firstclasses (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-14-123-1-234-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* firstday (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-5-145
match %[_~^]%<* firstdayer (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-5-145-12456
match %[_~^]%<* firstfruit (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-124-1235-136-24-2345
match %[_~^]%<* firstfruiting (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-124-1235-136-24-2345-346
match %[_~^]%<* firstgeneration (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1245-26-12456-1-56-1345
match %[_~^]%<* firsthand (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-125-12346
match %[_~^]%<* firsthanded (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-125-12346-1246
match %[_~^]%<* firstling (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-123-346
match %[_~^]%<* firstly (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-123-13456
match %[_~^]%<* firstness (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* firstnight (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1345-24-126-2345
match %[_~^]%<* firstnighter (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1345-24-126-2345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* firstrate (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1235-1-2345-15
match %[_~^]%<* firstrated (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1235-1-2345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* firstrating (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-1235-1-2345-346
match %[_~^]%<* firststring (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34-34-1235-346
match %[_~^]%<* forasmuch (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 123456-1-234-134-16
match %[_~^]%<* foresaid (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 123456-15-234-145
match %[_~^]%<* fosterchildren (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-135-34-12456-16-1345
match %[_~^]%<* friendless (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-1235-46-234
match %[_~^]%<* friendlessness (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-1235-46-234-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* friendlessnesses (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-1235-46-234-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* friendlier (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-1235-123-24-12456
match %[_~^]%<* friendlies (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-1235-123-24-15-234
